Nevada, session 83, AB222.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 338 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. Preference in the employment of workers and
apprentices for the purposes of sections 3 and 4 of this act must be
given:
-
*AB222*

– 3 –
1. First: To persons who are women and are citizens of this
State.
2. Second: To persons who:
(a) Have been honorably discharged from the Army, Navy, Air
Force, Marine Corps or Coast Guard of the United States, a
reserve component thereof or the National Guard; and
(b) Are citizens of this State.
3. Third: To persons who are residents of historically
underserved communities and are citizens of this State.
4. Fourth: To persons who are residents of rural areas of this
State and are citizens of this State.
5. Fifth: To persons who were formerly incarcerated and are
citizens of this State.
6. Sixth: To persons who are under 26 years of age and are
citizens of this State.
Sec. 3. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter and except as otherwise provided in this section, a
contractor or subcontractor engaged in vertical construction who
employs workers on one or more public works during a calendar
year pursuant to NRS 338.040 shall employ persons in accordance
with the provisions of section 2 of this act for at least 10 percent,
or any percentage established pursuant to subsection 3, of the total
hours of labor worked for each public work.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and
except as otherwise provided in this section, a contractor or
subcontractor engaged in horizontal construction who employs
workers on one or more public works during a calendar year
pursuant to NRS 338.040 shall employ persons in accordance with
the provisions of section 2 of this act for at least 3 percent, or any
percentage established pursuant to subsection 3, of the total hours
of labor worked for each public work.
3. The Labor Commissioner may adopt regulations to revise
the percentage of total hours of labor required to be performed
pursuant to subsection 1 or 2.
4. A contractor or subcontractor engaged on a public work
shall maintain and provide to the Labor Commissioner any
supporting documentation to show that the contractor or
subcontractor made a good faith effort to comply with subsection 1
or 2, as applicable, as determined by the Labor Commissioner. For
the purposes of this section, a contractor or subcontractor makes a
good faith effort to comply with subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, if
the contractor or subcontractor submits to the Labor
Commissioner:
(a) Documentation of conversations with community
organizations; or
-
*AB222*

– 4 –
(b) Records that applicants or employees from the groups
described in section 2 of this act refused employment offers or
were unavailable or absent.
5. On or before February 15 of each year, a contractor or
subcontractor engaged in vertical or horizontal construction, as
applicable, who employs a worker on one or more public works
pursuant to NRS 338.040 shall report to the Labor Commissioner,
on the form prescribed by the Labor Commissioner, the following
information regarding those public works for the previous
calendar year:
(a) For each public work, the total number of hours worked on
vertical construction.
(b) For each public work, the total number of hours worked on
horizontal construction.
(c) For each public work, the total number of hours worked by
the persons employed in accordance with the provisions of section
2 of this act on vertical construction.
(d) For each public work, the total number of hours worked by
the persons employed in accordance with the provisions of section
2 of this act on horizontal construction.
(e) For each public work, the percentage of the total number
of hours worked on vertical construction that were worked by the
persons employed in accordance with the provisions of section 2 of
this act.
(f) For each public work, the percentage of the total number of
hours worked on horizontal construction that were worked by the
persons employed in accordance with the provisions of section 2 of
this act.
(g) The outreach efforts of the contractor or subcontractor to
employ persons in accordance with the provisions of section 2 of
this act and the results of such efforts.
6. The information required to be reported pursuant to
subsection 5 must not include any identifying information about a
public work or an apprentice or employee.
7. If the Labor Commissioner, on his or her own initiative or
based on a complaint, makes a determination based on the
information submitted pursuant to subsection 5 that a contractor
or subcontractor did not make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, the Labor
Commissioner shall:
(a) Impose a penalty of not more than $1,000; and
(b) For a second or subsequent violation, disqualify the
contractor or subcontractor from being awarded a contract for a
period of not longer than 2 years.
-
*AB222*

– 5 –
8. A contractor or subcontractor may request a hearing on
the determination of the Labor Commissioner pursuant to
subsection 7 within 10 days after receipt of the determination of
the Labor Commissioner. The hearing must be conducted in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Labor Commissioner.
If the Labor Commissioner does not receive a request for a
hearing pursuant to this subsection, the determination of the
Labor Commissioner is a final decision for the purposes of
judicial review pursuant to chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 4. 1. In addition to the requirements of subsection 1 of
NRS 338.01165, if any apprenticed craft or type of work to be
performed on those public works includes at least 400 hours of
such craft or type of work, a contractor or subcontractor shall use
apprentices employed in accordance with the provisions of section
2 of this act, for at least 10 percent, or any percentage established
pursuant to subsection 3, of the total hours required to be
performed by apprentices pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 338.01165.
2. In addition to the requirements of subsection 2 of NRS
338.01165, if any apprenticed craft or type of work to be
performed on those public works includes at least 800 hours of
such craft or type of work, a contractor or subcontractor shall use
apprentices employed in accordance with the provisions of section
2 of this act, for at least 3 percent, or any percentage established
pursuant to subsection 3, of the total hours required to be
performed by apprentices pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 338.01165.
3. The Labor Commissioner may adopt regulations to revise
the percentage of total hours of labor required to be performed
pursuant to subsection 1 or 2.
4. A contractor or subcontractor engaged on a public work
shall maintain and provide to the Labor Commissioner any
supporting documentation to show that the contractor or
subcontractor made a good faith effort to comply with subsection 1
or 2, as applicable, as determined by the Labor Commissioner. For
the purposes of this section, a contractor or subcontractor makes a
good faith effort to comply with subsection 1 or 2 if the contractor
or subcontractor submits to the Labor Commissioner:
(a) Documentation of conversations with apprenticeship
programs and community organizations; or
(b) Records that apprentices from the groups described in
section 2 of this act refused employment offers or were
unavailable or absent.
5. In addition to the report required by subsection 10 of NRS
338.01165, on or before February 15 of each year, a contractor or
-
*AB222*

– 6 –
subcontractor engaged in vertical or horizontal construction, as
applicable, who is required to comply with subsection 1 or 2, as
applicable, on one or more public works, shall report to the Labor
Commissioner, on the form prescribed by the Labor
Commissioner, the following information regarding those public
works for the previous calendar year:
(a) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the total
number of hours worked by apprentices who are employed in
accordance with the provisions of section 2 of this act on vertical
construction.
(b) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the total
number of hours worked by apprentices who are employed in
accordance with the provisions of section 2 of this act on
horizontal construction.
(c) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the percentage
of the total number of hours worked on vertical construction that
were worked by apprentices who are employed in accordance with
the provisions of section 2 of this act.
(d) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the percentage
of the total number of hours worked on horizontal construction
that were worked by apprentices who are employed in accordance
with the provisions of section 2 of this act.
(e) The outreach efforts of the contractor or subcontractor to
employ apprentices in accordance with the provisions of section 2
of this act and the results of such efforts.
6. The information required to be reported pursuant to
subsection 5 must not include any identifying information about a
public work or an apprentice or employee.
7. If the Labor Commissioner, on his or her own initiative or
based on a complaint, makes a determination based on the
information submitted pursuant to subsection 5 that a contractor
or subcontractor did not make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, the Labor
Commissioner shall:
(a) Impose a penalty of not more than $1,000; and
(b) For a second or subsequent violation, disqualify the
contractor or subcontractor from being awarded a contract for a
period of not longer than 2 years.
8. A contractor or subcontractor may request a hearing on
the determination of the Labor Commissioner pursuant to
subsection 7 within 10 days after receipt of the determination of
the Labor Commissioner. The hearing must be conducted in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Labor Commissioner.
If the Labor Commissioner does not receive a request for a
hearing pursuant to this subsection, the determination of the
-
*AB222*

– 7 –
Labor Commissioner is a final decision for the purposes of
judicial review pursuant to chapter 233B of NRS.
9. To comply with the requirements of subsection 1 or 2, as
applicable, a contractor or subcontractor may coordinate with a
union, community organization or educational institution to create
a training program or establish a mentorship program within an
apprenticeship program.
Sec. 5. NRS 338.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.010 As used in this chapter:
1. “Apprentice” means a person enrolled in an
apprenticeship program recognized by the State Apprenticeship
Council.
2. “Apprenticed craft or type of work” means a craft or type
of work for which there is an existing apprenticeship program.
3. “Apprenticeship program” means an apprenticeship
program recognized by the State Apprenticeship Council.
4. “Authorized representative” means a person designated by a
public body to be responsible for the development, solicitation,
award or administration of contracts for public works pursuant to
this chapter.
[2.] 5. “Bona fide fringe benefit” means a benefit in the form
of a contribution that is made not less frequently than monthly to an
independent third party pursuant to a fund, plan or program:
(a) Which is established for the sole and exclusive benefit of a
worker and his or her family and dependents; and
(b) For which none of the assets will revert to, or otherwise be
credited to, any contributing employer or sponsor of the fund, plan
or program.
 The term includes, without limitation, benefits for a worker that
are determined pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement and
included in the determination of the prevailing wage by the Labor
Commissioner pursuant to NRS 338.030.
[3.] 6. “Contract” means a written contract entered into
between a contractor and a public body for the provision of labor,
materials, equipment or supplies for a public work.
[4.] 7. “Contractor” means:
(a) A person who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 624 of NRS.
(b) A design-build team.
[5.] 8. “Day labor” means all cases where public bodies, their
officers, agents or employees, hire, supervise and pay the wages
thereof directly to a worker or workers employed by them on public
works by the day and not under a contract in writing.
-
*AB222*

– 8 –
[6.] 9. “Design-build contract” means a contract between a
public body and a design-build team in which the design-build team
agrees to design and construct a public work.
[7.] 10. “Design-build team” means an entity that consists of:
(a) At least one person who is licensed as a general engineering
contractor or a general building contractor pursuant to chapter 624
of NRS; and
(b) For a public work that consists of:
(1) A building and its site, at least one person who holds a
certificate of registration to practice architecture pursuant to chapter
623 of NRS.
(2) Anything other than a building and its site, at least one
person who holds a certificate of registration to practice architecture
pursuant to chapter 623 of NRS or landscape architecture pursuant
to chapter 623A of NRS or who is licensed as a professional
engineer pursuant to chapter 625 of NRS.
[8.] 11. “Design professional” means:
(a) A person who is licensed as a professional engineer pursuant
to chapter 625 of NRS;
(b) A person who is licensed as a professional land surveyor
pursuant to chapter 625 of NRS;
(c) A person who holds a certificate of registration to engage in
the practice of architecture, interior design or residential design
pursuant to chapter 623 of NRS;
(d) A person who holds a certificate of registration to engage in
the practice of landscape architecture pursuant to chapter 623A of
NRS; or
(e) A business entity that engages in the practice of professional
engineering, land surveying, architecture or landscape architecture.
[9.] 12. “Discrete project” means one or more public works
which are undertaken on a single construction site for a single public
body. The term does not include one or more public works that are
undertaken on multiple construction sites regardless of whether the
public body which sponsors or finances the public works bundles
the public works together.
[10.] 13. “Division” means the State Public Works Division of
the Department of Administration.
[11.] 14. “Eligible bidder” means a person who is:
(a) Found to be a responsible and responsive contractor by a
local government or its authorized representative which requests
bids for a public work in accordance with paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of NRS 338.1373; or
(b) Determined by a public body or its authorized representative
which awarded a contract for a public work pursuant to
-
*AB222*

– 9 –
NRS 338.1375 to 338.139, inclusive, to be qualified to bid on that
contract pursuant to NRS 338.1379 or 338.1382.
[12.] 15. “General contractor” means a person who is licensed
to conduct business in one, or both, of the following branches of the
contracting business:
(a) General engineering contracting, as described in subsection 2
of NRS 624.215.
(b) General building contracting, as described in subsection 3 of
NRS 624.215.
[13.] 16. “Governing body” means the board, council,
commission or other body in which the general legislative and fiscal
powers of a local government are vested.
[14.] 17. “Horizontal construction” means any construction,
alteration, repair, renovation, demolition or remodeling necessary to
complete a public work, including, without limitation, any
irrigation, drainage, water supply, flood control, harbor, railroad,
highway, tunnel, airport or airway, sewer, sewage disposal plant or
water treatment facility and any ancillary vertical components
thereof, bridge, inland waterway, pipeline for the transmission of
petroleum or any other liquid or gaseous substance, pier, and any
other work incidental thereto. The term does not include vertical
construction, the construction of any terminal or other building of an
airport or airway, or the construction of any other building.
[15.] 18. “Local government” means every political
subdivision or other entity which has the right to levy or receive
money from ad valorem or other taxes or any mandatory
assessments, and includes, without limitation, counties, cities,
towns, boards, school districts and other districts organized pursuant
to chapters 244A, 318, 318A, 379, 474, 538, 541, 543 and 555 of
NRS, NRS 450.550 to 450.750, inclusive, and any agency or
department of a county or city which prepares a budget separate
from that of the parent political subdivision. The term includes a
person who has been designated by the governing body of a local
government to serve as its authorized representative.
[16.] 19. “Offense” means:
(a) Failing to:
(1) Pay the prevailing wage required pursuant to this chapter;
(2) Pay the contributions for unemployment compensation
required pursuant to chapter 612 of NRS;
(3) Provide and secure compensation for employees required
pursuant to chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS; or
(4) Comply with subsection 5 or 6 of NRS 338.070.
(b) Discharging an obligation to pay wages in a manner that
violates the provisions of NRS 338.035.
[17.] 20. “Prime contractor” means a contractor who:
-
*AB222*

– 10 –
(a) Contracts to construct an entire project;
(b) Coordinates all work performed on the entire project;
(c) Uses his or her own workforce to perform all or a part of the
public work; and
(d) Contracts for the services of any subcontractor or
independent contractor or is responsible for payment to any
contracted subcontractors or independent contractors.
 The term includes, without limitation, a general contractor or a
specialty contractor who is authorized to bid on a project pursuant to
NRS 338.139 or 338.148.
[18.] 21. “Public body” means the State, county, city, town,
school district or any public agency of this State or its political
subdivisions sponsoring or financing a public work.
[19.] 22. “Public work” means any project for the new
construction, repair or reconstruction of a project financed in whole
or in part from public money for:
(a) Public buildings;
(b) Jails and prisons;
(c) Public roads;
(d) Public highways;
(e) Public streets and alleys;
(f) Public utilities;
(g) Publicly owned water mains and sewers;
(h) Public parks and playgrounds;
(i) Public convention facilities which are financed at least in part
with public money; and
(j) All other publicly owned works and property.
[20.] 23. “Specialty contractor” means a person who is
licensed to conduct business as described in subsection 4 of
NRS 624.215.
[21.] 24. “Stand-alone underground utility project” means an
underground utility project that is not integrated into a larger
project, including, without limitation:
(a) An underground sewer line or an underground pipeline for
the conveyance of water, including facilities appurtenant thereto;
and
(b) A project for the construction or installation of a storm drain,
including facilities appurtenant thereto,
 that is not located at the site of a public work for the design and
construction of which a public body is authorized to contract with a
design-build team pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 338.1711.
[22.] 25. “State Apprenticeship Council” means the State
Apprenticeship Council created by NRS 610.030.
26. “Subcontract” means a written contract entered into
between:
-
*AB222*

– 11 –
(a) A contractor and a subcontractor or supplier; or
(b) A subcontractor and another subcontractor or supplier,
 for the provision of labor, materials, equipment or supplies for a
construction project.
[23.] 27. “Subcontractor” means a person who:
(a) Is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter 624 of NRS
or performs such work that the person is not required to be licensed
pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS; and
(b) Contracts with a contractor, another subcontractor or a
supplier to provide labor, materials or services for a construction
project.
[24.] 28. “Supplier” means a person who provides materials,
equipment or supplies for a construction project.
[25.] 29. “Vertical construction” means any construction,
alteration, repair, renovation, demolition or remodeling necessary to
complete a public work for any building, structure or other
improvement that is predominantly vertical, including, without
limitation, a building, structure or improvement for the support,
shelter and enclosure of persons, animals, chattels or movable
property of any kind, and any other work or improvement
appurtenant thereto.
[26.] 30. “Wages” means:
(a) The basic hourly rate of pay; and
(b) The amount of pension, health and welfare, vacation and
holiday pay, the cost of apprenticeship training or other bona fide
fringe benefits which are a benefit to the worker.
[27.] 31. “Worker” means a skilled mechanic, skilled worker,
semiskilled mechanic, semiskilled worker or unskilled worker in the
service of a contractor or subcontractor under any appointment or
contract of hire or apprenticeship, express or implied, oral or
written, whether lawfully or unlawfully employed. The term does
not include a design professional.
Sec. 6. NRS 338.01165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.01165 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter and except as otherwise provided in this section, a
contractor or subcontractor engaged in vertical construction who
employs workers on one or more public works during a calendar
year pursuant to NRS 338.040 shall use one or more apprentices for
at least 10 percent, or any increased percentage established pursuant
to subsection 3, of the total hours of labor worked for each
apprenticed craft or type of work to be performed on those public
works.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and
except as otherwise provided in this section, a contractor or
subcontractor engaged in horizontal construction who employs
-
*AB222*

– 12 –
workers on one or more public works during a calendar year
pursuant to NRS 338.040 shall use one or more apprentices for at
least 3 percent, or any increased percentage established pursuant to
subsection 3, of the total hours of labor worked for each apprenticed
craft or type of work to be performed on those public works.
3. On or after January 1, 2021, the Labor Commissioner, in
collaboration with the State Apprenticeship Council, may adopt
regulations to increase the percentage of total hours of labor
required to be performed by an apprentice pursuant to subsection 1
or 2 by not more than 2 percentage points.
4. An apprentice who graduates from an apprenticeship
program while employed on a public work shall:
(a) Be deemed an apprentice on the public work for the purposes
of subsections 1 and 2.
(b) Be deemed a journeyman for all other purposes, including,
without limitation, the payment of wages or the payment of wages
and benefits to a journeyman covered by a collective bargaining
agreement.
5. If a contractor or subcontractor who is a signatory to a
collective bargaining agreement with a union that sponsors an
apprenticeship program for an apprenticed craft or type of work for
which the term of apprenticeship is not more than 3 years requests
an apprentice from that apprenticeship program and an apprentice in
the appropriate craft or type of work is not available, the contractor
or subcontractor may utilize a person who graduated from the
apprenticeship program in that craft or type of work within the 3
years immediately preceding the request from the contractor or
subcontractor. Such a person:
(a) Shall be deemed an apprentice on the public work for the
purposes of subsections 1 and 2.
(b) Shall be deemed a journeyman for all other purposes,
including, without limitation, the payment of wages and benefits to
a journeyman pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement.
6. A contractor or subcontractor engaged on a public work is
not required to use an apprentice in a craft or type of work
performed in a jurisdiction recognized by the State Apprenticeship
Council as not having apprentices in that craft or type of work.
7. A contractor or subcontractor engaged on a public work
shall maintain and provide to the Labor Commissioner any
supporting documentation to show that the contractor or
subcontractor made a good faith effort to comply with subsection 1
or 2, as applicable, as determined by the Labor Commissioner. For
purposes of this subsection, a contractor or subcontractor:
(a) Makes a good faith effort to comply with subsection 1 or 2,
as applicable, if the contractor or subcontractor:
-
*AB222*

– 13 –
(1) Submits to the apprenticeship program, on the form
prescribed by the Labor Commissioner, a request for an apprentice
not earlier than 10 days before the contractor or subcontractor is
scheduled to begin work on the public work and not later than 5
days after the contractor or subcontractor actually begins work on
the public work.
(2) If the apprenticeship program does not provide an
apprentice for the appropriate apprenticed craft or type of work
upon a request pursuant to subparagraph (1), submits additional
requests to the apprenticeship program, on the form prescribed by
the Labor Commissioner, at least once every 30 days during the
period that the contractor or subcontractor is working on the public
work. If a contractor or subcontractor does not work continuously
on the public work, the contractor or subcontractor shall submit an
additional request each time that the contractor or subcontractor
resumes work on the public work not earlier than 10 days before the
contractor or subcontractor is scheduled to resume work on the
public work and not later than 5 days after the contractor or
subcontractor actually resumes work on the public work. The
requirement for the submission of an additional request in this
subparagraph does not apply whenever a contractor or subcontractor
has one or more apprentices employed for that apprenticed craft or
type of work.
(b) Does not make a good faith effort to comply with subsection
1 or 2, as applicable, as determined by the Labor Commissioner, if
the contractor or subcontractor is required to enter into an
apprenticeship agreement pursuant to subsection 16 and refuses to
do so.
8. The supporting documentation required pursuant to
subsection 7 may include, without limitation:
(a) Documentation of the submission by the contractor or
subcontractor of one or more requests, as applicable, pursuant to
subsection 7; and
(b) Documentation that the apprenticeship program denied such
a request, did not respond to such a request or responded that the
program was unable to provide the requested apprentice.
9. The contractor or subcontractor and the apprenticeship
program shall coordinate the starting date for any apprentice
provided by the program.
10. On or before February 15 of each year, a contractor or
subcontractor engaged in vertical or horizontal construction, as
applicable, who employs a worker on one or more public works
pursuant to NRS 338.040 shall report to the Labor Commissioner,
on the form prescribed by the Labor Commissioner, the following
-
*AB222*

– 14 –
information regarding those public works for the previous calendar
year:
(a) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the total number
of hours worked on vertical construction.
(b) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the total number
of hours worked on horizontal construction.
(c) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the total number
of hours worked by apprentices on vertical construction.
(d) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the total number
of hours worked by apprentices on horizontal construction.
(e) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the percentage of
the total number of hours worked on vertical construction that were
worked by apprentices.
(f) For each apprenticed craft or type of work, the percentage of
the total number of hours worked on horizontal construction that
were worked by apprentices.
11. The information required to be reported pursuant to
subsection 10 must not include any identifying information about a
public work or an apprentice or employee.
12. If the Labor Commissioner, on his or her own initiative or
based on a complaint, makes a determination based on the
information submitted pursuant to subsection 10 that a contractor or
subcontractor did not make a good faith effort to comply with the
provisions of subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, the Labor
Commissioner shall notify the contractor or subcontractor in writing
of the determination and:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), shall assess a
penalty as follows:
(1) If the apprentice utilization rate by the contractor or
subcontractor on vertical construction of a public work is:
(I) Seven and one-half percent or more but less than 10
percent of the total hours of labor worked for an apprenticed craft or
type of work, a penalty of $2,500 or $2 for each hour below the
percentage required, whichever is higher.
(II) More than 4 percent but less than 7.5 percent of the
total hours of labor worked for an apprenticed craft or type of work,
a penalty of $3,000 or $4 for each hour below the percentage
required, whichever is higher.
(III) Four percent or less of the total hours of labor
worked for an apprenticed craft or type of work, a penalty of $5,000
or $6 for each hour below the percentage required, whichever is
higher.
(2) If the apprentice utilization rate by the contractor or
subcontractor on horizontal construction of a public work is:
-
*AB222*

– 15 –
(I) Two percent or more but less than 3 percent of the
total hours of labor worked for an apprenticed craft or type of work,
a penalty of $2,500 or $2 for each hour below the percentage
required, whichever is higher.
(II) More than 1 percent but less than 2 percent of the
total hours of labor worked for an apprenticed craft or type of work,
a penalty of $3,000 or $4 for each hour below the percentage
required, whichever is higher.
(III) One percent or less of the total hours of labor worked
for an apprenticed craft or type of work, a penalty of $5,000 or $6
for each hour below the percentage required, whichever is higher.
(b) Shall not assess a penalty if the total number of hours of
labor required to be worked by apprentices:
(1) On vertical construction pursuant to subsection 1, as
applicable, during the previous calendar year is less than 40 hours.
(2) On horizontal construction pursuant to subsection 2, as
applicable, during the previous calendar year is less than 24 hours.
13. Except for good cause, the Labor Commissioner may not
initiate his or her own investigation or accept a complaint based on
the information submitted by a contractor or subcontractor pursuant
to subsection 10 after May 1 immediately following the date on
which the report was received by the Labor Commissioner.
14. In addition to the penalties set forth in subsection 12, if the
Labor Commissioner, on his or her own initiative or based on a
complaint, makes a determination that a contractor or subcontractor
did not submit the report required pursuant to subsection 10 or made
no attempt to comply with the provisions of subsection 1 or 2, as
applicable, the Labor Commissioner shall:
(a) Impose a penalty of not less than $10,000 but not more than
$75,000; or
(b) Disqualify the contractor or subcontractor from being
awarded a contract for a public work for at least 180 days but not
more than 2 years.
15. A contractor or subcontractor may request a hearing on the
determination of the Labor Commissioner pursuant to subsection 12
or 14 within 10 days after receipt of the determination of the Labor
Commissioner. The hearing must be conducted in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Labor Commissioner. If the Labor
Commissioner does not receive a request for a hearing pursuant to
this subsection, the determination of the Labor Commissioner is a
final decision for the purposes of judicial review pursuant to chapter
233B of NRS.
16. A contractor or subcontractor who is not a signatory to a
collective bargaining agreement with the union sponsoring the
apprenticeship program for an apprenticed craft or type of work
-
*AB222*

– 16 –
engaged on a public work shall enter into an apprenticeship
agreement for each apprentice required to be used in the
construction of a public work.
17. As used in this section [:
(a) “Apprentice” means a person enrolled in an apprenticeship
program recognized by the State Apprenticeship Council.
(b) “Apprenticed craft or type of work” means a craft or type of
work for which there is an existing apprenticeship program
recognized by the State Apprenticeship Council.
(c) “Apprenticeship program” means an apprenticeship program
recognized by the State Apprenticeship Council.
(d) “Journeyman”] , “journeyman” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 624.260.
[(e) “State Apprenticeship Council” means the State
Apprenticeship Council created by NRS 610.030.]
Sec. 7. NRS 338.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.015 1. The Labor Commissioner shall enforce the
provisions of NRS 338.010 to 338.130, inclusive [.] , and sections
2, 3 and 4 of this act.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 338.035 and
338.01165 and sections 3 and 4 of this act, and in addition to any
other remedy or penalty provided in this chapter, if any person,
including, without limitation, a public body, violates any provision
of NRS 338.010 to 338.130, inclusive, and sections 2, 3 and 4 of
this act, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, the Labor
Commissioner may, after providing the person with notice and an
opportunity for a hearing, impose against the person an
administrative penalty of not more than $5,000 for each such
violation.
3. The Labor Commissioner may, by regulation, establish a
sliding scale based on the severity of the violation to determine the
amount of the administrative penalty to be imposed against the
person pursuant to this section.
4. The Labor Commissioner shall report the violation to the
Attorney General, and the Attorney General may prosecute the
person in accordance with law.
Sec. 8. NRS 338.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.070 1. Any public body awarding a contract shall:
(a) Investigate possible violations of the provisions of NRS
338.010 to 338.090, inclusive, and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act,
committed in the course of the execution of the contract, and
determine whether a violation has been committed and inform the
Labor Commissioner of any such violations; and
(b) When making payments to the contractor engaged on the
public work of money becoming due under the contract, withhold
-
*AB222*

– 17 –
and retain all sums forfeited pursuant to the provisions of NRS
338.010 to 338.090, inclusive [.] , and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this
act.
2. No sum may be withheld, retained or forfeited, except from
the final payment, without a full investigation being made by the
awarding public body.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, it is lawful for
any contractor engaged on a public work to withhold from any
subcontractor engaged on the public work sufficient sums to cover
any penalties withheld from the contractor by the awarding public
body on account of the failure of the subcontractor to comply with
the terms of NRS 338.010 to 338.090, inclusive [.] , and sections 2,
3 and 4 of this act. If payment has already been made to the
subcontractor, the contractor may recover from the subcontractor the
amount of the penalty or forfeiture in a suit at law.
4. A contractor engaged on a public work and each
subcontractor engaged on the public work shall:
(a) Inquire of each worker employed by the contractor or
subcontractor in connection with the public work:
(1) Whether the worker wishes to specify voluntarily his or
her gender; and
(2) Whether the worker wishes to specify voluntarily his or
her ethnicity; and
(b) For each response the contractor or subcontractor receives
pursuant to paragraph (a):
(1) If the worker chose voluntarily to specify his or her
gender or ethnicity, or both, record the worker’s responses; and
(2) If the worker declined to specify his or her gender or
ethnicity, or both, record that the worker declined to specify such
information.
 A contractor or subcontractor shall not compel or coerce a worker
to specify his or her gender or ethnicity and shall not penalize or
otherwise take any adverse action against a worker who declines to
specify his or her gender or ethnicity. Before inquiring as to whether
a worker wishes to specify voluntarily his or her gender or ethnicity,
the applicable contractor or subcontractor must inform the worker
that such information, if provided, will be open to public inspection
as set forth in subsection 6.
5. A contractor engaged on a public work and each
subcontractor engaged on the public work shall keep or cause to be
kept:
(a) An accurate record showing, for each worker employed by
the contractor or subcontractor in connection with the public work:
(1) The name of the worker;
(2) The occupation of the worker;
-
*AB222*

– 18 –
(3) The gender of the worker, if the worker voluntarily
agreed to specify that information pursuant to subsection 4, or an
entry indicating that the worker declined to specify such
information;
(4) The ethnicity of the worker, if the worker voluntarily
agreed to specify that information pursuant to subsection 4, or an
entry indicating that the worker declined to specify such
information;
(5) If the worker has a driver’s license or identification card,
an indication of the state or other jurisdiction that issued the license
or card; and
(6) The actual per diem, wages and benefits paid to the
worker; and
(b) An additional accurate record showing, for each worker
employed by the contractor or subcontractor in connection with the
public work who has a driver’s license or identification card:
(1) The name of the worker;
(2) The driver’s license number or identification card number
of the worker; and
(3) The state or other jurisdiction that issued the license or
card.
6. The records maintained pursuant to subsection 5 must be
open at all reasonable hours to the inspection of the public body
awarding the contract. The contractor engaged on the public work or
subcontractor engaged on the public work shall ensure that a copy of
each record for each calendar month is received by the public body
awarding the contract no later than 15 days after the end of the
month. The copy of the record maintained pursuant to paragraph (a)
of subsection 5 must be open to public inspection as provided in
NRS 239.010. The copy of the record maintained pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 5 is confidential and not open to public
inspection. The records in the possession of the public body
awarding the contract may be discarded by the public body 2 years
after final payment is made by the public body for the public work.
The Labor Commissioner shall adopt regulations authorizing and
prescribing the procedures for the electronic filing of the copies of
the records required to be provided monthly by a contractor or
subcontractor to a public body pursuant to this subsection.
7. A contractor engaged on a public work shall not withhold
from a subcontractor engaged on the public work the sums
necessary to cover any penalties provided pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 338.060 that may be withheld from the contractor by the
public body awarding the contract because the public body did not
receive a copy of the record maintained by the subcontractor
-
*AB222*

– 19 –
pursuant to subsection 5 for a calendar month by the time specified
in subsection 6 if:
(a) The subcontractor provided to the contractor, for submission
to the public body by the contractor, a copy of the record not later
than the later of:
(1) Ten days after the end of the month; or
(2) A date agreed upon by the contractor and subcontractor;
and
(b) The contractor failed to submit the copy of the record to the
public body by the time specified in subsection 6.
 Nothing in this subsection prohibits a subcontractor from
submitting a copy of a record for a calendar month directly to the
public body by the time specified in subsection 6.
8. Any contractor or subcontractor, or agent or representative
thereof, performing work for a public work who neglects to comply
with the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 9. NRS 338.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, any
person, including the officers, agents or employees of a public body,
who violates any provision of NRS 338.010 to 338.090, inclusive,
and sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act, or any regulation adopted
pursuant thereto, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
2. The Labor Commissioner, in addition to any other remedy or
penalty provided in this chapter:
(a) Shall, except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, assess a
person who, after an opportunity for a hearing, is found to have
failed to pay the prevailing wage required pursuant to NRS 338.020
to 338.090, inclusive, an amount equal to the difference between the
prevailing wages required to be paid and the wages that the
contractor or subcontractor actually paid;
(b) Shall require a person found to have willfully and repeatedly
failed to pay the prevailing wage required pursuant to NRS 338.020
to 338.090, inclusive, to pay damages to each affected worker in an
amount equal to the difference between the prevailing wages
required to be paid and the wages that the contractor or
subcontractor actually paid to the worker; and
(c) May, in addition to any other administrative penalty, impose
an administrative penalty not to exceed the costs incurred by the
Labor Commissioner to investigate and prosecute the matter.
3. If the Labor Commissioner finds that a person has failed to
pay the prevailing wage required pursuant to NRS 338.020 to
338.090, inclusive, the public body may, in addition to any other
remedy or penalty provided in this chapter, require the person to pay
the actual costs incurred by the public body to investigate the
matter.
-
*AB222*

– 20 –
4. The Labor Commissioner is not required to assess a person
an amount equal to the difference between the prevailing wages
required to be paid and the wages that the contractor or
subcontractor actually paid if the contractor or subcontractor has
already paid that amount to a worker pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 4 of NRS 338.035.
5. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a
subcontractor specified in NRS 338.072.
Sec. 10. The initial reports required pursuant to subsection 5
of section 3 of this act and subsection 5 of section 4 of this act, must
be submitted on or before February 15, 2027, and must include
information for the period which begins on October 1, 2025, and
ends on December 31, 2026.
Sec. 11. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to
a contract for a public work for which bids have been submitted
before October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB222*